Illinois, session 104th, HB5326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $780,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to the Forest Preserve District of 8Cook County for the administration and operation of Greencorps 9Chicago and Forest Preserve Experience programs within the 10Conservation Corps program. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.